District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.11

Student-athlete’s right to cancel.

(a)

A student-athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving notice of the cancellation to the athlete agent in a record within 14 days after the contract is signed.

(b)

A student-athlete may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.

(c)

If a student-athlete cancels an agency contract, the student-athlete is not required to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration received from the athlete agent to induce the student-athlete to enter into the contract.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.